Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 5. Special Management Areas.

Sec. 41.21.500.
Purpose of AS 41.21.500
—
41.21.514.

The purpose of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

is

to designate as a unit of the state park system under this chapter the land and water described in AS

41.21.502(a)

;

to protect and perpetuate the fishery and wildlife resources and habitat in the unit and adjacent area; and

to manage recreational uses and development activities in the unit and adjacent area.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984)

Sec. 41.21.502.
Kenai River Special Management Area.

The surface estate in the land and water presently owned by the state and all land and water acquired by the state in the future, including shore, tide, and submerged land, lying within the parcels described in this section is designated as the Kenai River Special Management Area:

the Kenai River at the common section line of Sections 16 and 17, Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian, upstream to and including the waters of the Kenai and Skilak Lakes;

the Moose River from its confluence with the Kenai River upstream to the Sterling Highway Bridge;

the Funny River from its confluence with the Kenai River upstream to the Funny River Road Bridge;

the state land in the Kenai Recording District that is located within the following parcels:

Kenai Keys

Bing’s Landing

Izaak Walton

Nilnunqa

Funny River

Morgan’s Landing

Kenai River Islands

Slikok Creek

Big Eddy

Ciechanski

Kenai River Flats

Other Lower River Land

Subject to valid existing rights, the land and water described in (a) of this section is designated as a special purpose area under art. VIII, § 7, of the Alaska Constitution.

The mineral estate in the state-owned land and water described in (a) of this section is open to oil and gas leasing under AS

38.05.180

. The mineral estate in the state-owned land and water described in (a) of this section is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.181

—

38.05.275

.

Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Section 26: General Land Office Lot 9

Section 36:

According to the Stephenkie Alaska Subdivision,

Alaska State Land Survey No. 73-146:

Lots 2, 3, 5 — 8 and 12 — 33 of Block 2

Tract B

A small un-meandered island located within the

SE1/4SE1/4 of Section 36

General Land Office Lots 2, 3

SW1/4NE1/4

NE1/4NW1/4

Excluding the Kenai Keys Road Right-of-Way and Stephenkie Alaska Subdivision, Alaska State Land Survey No. 73-146

Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Section 16: Portion of W1/2W1/2 lying south of the Sterling Highway

Section 20: Lot 1

Section 21: Lot 3

Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Section 7:

Parcel #1: Starting at the Southwest corner of Lot 6, Section 7, T5N, R8W, go South 0° 08´ East a distance of 888.1 feet to the center of road to corner no. 1, which is the true point of beginning; then North 73° 5´ West along the center of the road a distance of 727 feet to corner no. 2; then in a southwesterly direction a distance of 515.6 feet plus or minus, along the line of mean high water of Moose River to point no. 3; then a distance of 108 feet plus or minus, to point no. 4 along the line of mean high water of Moose River to Kenai River; then a distance of 75.3 feet plus or minus, to point no. 5 along that river; then upstream a distance of 808.6 feet plus or minus, at mean high water along Kenai River to point no. 6; then North 0° 8´ West 150 feet to point no. 7; then south 89° 57´ East a distance of 208 feet to point no. 8; then North 0° 08´ West 213.9 feet to point no. 1, which is the true point of beginning.

Parcel #2: Starting at the Southwest corner of Lot 6, Section 7, T5N, R8W, go South 0° 08´ East a distance of 1102.0 feet to corner no. 1, which is the true point of beginning; then North 89° 57´ West 208.0 feet to corner no. 2; then South 0° 08´ East 150 feet plus or minus to corner no. 3, which is a point at mean high water of the Kenai River, then Southeasterly a distance of 238 feet plus or minus, along the line of high water of that river to corner no. 4, which is a point 268 feet plus or minus, South 0° 08´ East of corner no. 1, then North 0° 08´ West 268 feet plus or minus to corner no. 1, which is the true point of beginning, containing one acre plus or minus.

Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Section 7: Lot 10

Township 5 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Section 28: SE1/4SE1/4

Tract 6, Heistand Subdivision,

Addition No. 2

Section 33: Lots 1, 3

SE1/4NW1/4

portion of NE1/4 lying west of the Funny River Road

Township 5 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Section 21: SW1/4SE1/4

Section 28: Lots 2, 3, 7 — 9, 14, 15

NE1/4NW1/4

NW1/4SW1/4

Section 33: Lot 2

Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Section 27: Lots 10, 17

Township 5 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Section 6: Lots 9 — 10

Section 7: Lots 2 — 4, 8, 11, 16

Section 18: Lots 2, 3, 14

Section 19: Lots 3, 17

Section 30: Lots 2, 8

Section 31: Lots 7, 10

Section 32: Lot 7

Section 33: Lots 5, 8

Section 34: Lot 10

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 36: Lot 2 within NE1/4

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 36: Tract “A”, Slikok Creek Alaska Subdivision

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 24: Lots 14, 15

NW1/4NE1/4SE1/4

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 24: Lot 1

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 15: Lot 8

NW1/4SE1/4

N1/2SW1/4

N1/2S1/2SW1/4

Township 5 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Section 22:
Lots 4, 9, 10, NE1/4SW1/4

Township 5 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Section 6:
Lot 8

Section 7:
Lots 5 — 7, 15

Section 18:
Lots 1, 2, 4 — 6, Tract A, Larry’s Fishing Hole Subdivision, Plat No. 90-42 Government Lots 4 — 7, 10 — 13

NE1/4SW1/4

E1/2NW1/4

Section 19:

Tracts A and B, Timberland Terrace Phase 1 Subdivision, Plat 97-26

Lot 4, Kobylarz Subdivision, according to the official plat filed under Plat No. 92-24, Kenai Recording Office

Beginning at the section corner common to Sections 19, 20, 29, and 30, Township 5 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian, traverse west along the section line common to Sections 19 and 30 a distance of 1320 feet, thence north along the 1/16 section line a distance of 1420 feet to Corner No. 1 and the point of beginning, thence west 100 feet to Corner No. 2, thence north to the thalweg of the Kenai River and Corner No. 3, thence east along the thalweg of the Kenai River to the point of intersection with 1/16 section line and Corner No. 4, thence south along the 1/16 section line to Corner No. 1, and the point of beginning, located in the Kenai Recording District, as may be modified by a record of survey accepted by the state

Lot 16

Section 30:
Tracts A, J, and K, Channel Shores Subdivision, Plat No. 85-102

Section 31:
Lots 2, 3, and 11, excluding the following subdivisions, as shown in record of survey no. 96-7: Halcyon Subdivision, Lot 1, Block 1, plat of survey no.
K-1706; Halcyon Subdivision Lot 5, Block 1, plat of survey no. 73-9; Halcyon Subdivision plat of survey no. 76-75; Halcyon Subdivision Addition No. 4, plat of survey no. 77-47; Halcyon Subdivision Addition No. 5, plat of survey no. 77-82; Halcyon Subdivision No. 3, plat of survey no. 78-25; Halcyon Subdivision Amended Plat Lot 1-B, Block 1, plat of survey no. 78-96; Halcyon Subdivision Addition No. 7, plat of survey no. 79-155; Halcyon Subdivision Addition No. 8, plat of survey no. 83-174; Halcyon Subdivision Addition No. 9, plat of survey no. 84-47; Halcyon Subdivision No. 10, plat of survey no. 84-244; Halcyon Subdivision No. 9, plat of survey no. 86-98RS; Halcyon Subdivision No. 9, plat of survey no. 86-99RS; Halcyon Subdivision No. 11, plat of survey no. 92-41; Halcyon Subdivision No. 8 Amended, plat of survey no. 92-72; and Halcyon Subdivision No. 12, plat of survey no. 93-8; and excluding that portion of Government Lot 3 east of Daisy Drive conveyed by warranty deed recorded March 10, 1989, in book 343, page 15, Kenai Recording Office.

Section 32:
Lot 1-B-1, ASLS No. 97-25, a subdivision of Lot 1-B, Fisherman’s Square Subdivision, Addition No. 1, within the W1/2SW1/4;

Section 33:
Lot 6-B, Mullen Homestead River Addition Phase 1, Plat No. 97-89;

Section 34:
Lot 7, NE1/4SE1/4

Township 5 North, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Section 1:
Lots 9 and 10

Section 11:
Tract A-1A, Cone Tracts; Lot 3, excluding that portion north of the south right-of-way boundary of the Beaver Loop Road and all land west of and including the Cone Tracts A-1A and A-1B Subdivision and SE1/4NW1/4, and the N1/2NW1/4, excluding that portion of the south right-of-way boundary of the Beaver Loop Road and all land west of and including the Cone Tracts A-1A and A-1B Subdivision

Section 12: Lots 1 — 3, 7 — 10, 13

N1/2SE1/4

SE1/4NE1/4

NE1/4SW1/4

N1/2SW1/4SE1/4

Section 13: Lot 1

SW1/4NW1/4

Section 14: Lots 2, 7

Section 16: Lots 1 — 10

SE1/4

NW1/4NW1/4

SE1/4SW1/4

Section 24:
That portion of Lot 11 within LSH 148

Section 25:
Lot 3

Section 36:
That strip of land between the line of ordinary high water of the Kenai River and EPF 21-11, Block 1.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984; am §§ 2, 3 ch 141 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose and intent applicable to the 2004 amendment of this section, see § 1, ch. 141, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

The condition required by ch. 148, SLA 1990, for the addition of a portion of Slikok Creek subdivision did not occur, and therefore the conditional amendment was repealed in § 17, ch. 20, SLA 2002.

Sec. 41.21.504.
Designation of management responsibilities.

The land and water described in AS

41.21.502(a)

is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

.

Nothing in AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

affects the applicability of

AS

41.99.010

and AS 16 regarding the responsibilities of the Department of Fish and Game or the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game; or

AS 46.03 regarding the responsibilities of the Department of Environmental Conservation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 106 § 5 (2003); am § 9 ch 31 SLA 2005)

Sec. 41.21.506.
Comprehensive management plan; regulations.

The commissioner shall develop and adopt a comprehensive management plan for the Kenai River Special Management Area in consultation with the Kenai Peninsula Borough. The plan may include the land adjacent to the rivers described in AS

41.21.502(a)(1)

— (3) whether the land is owned by the state or privately owned and may include other land considered appropriate by the commissioner and the Kenai Peninsula Borough. The commissioner shall periodically review the plan and adopt changes to the plan in consultation with the Kenai Peninsula Borough.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that are necessary to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

and to implement the plan adopted under (a) of this section. The regulations must

designate incompatible uses and prohibit or restrict them; and

establish a registration, licensing, or comparable procedure for professional fishing guides and such additional fishing guide controls as the commissioner considers necessary.

Until regulations adopted under AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

take effect, existing state regulations otherwise applicable to the Kenai River Special Management Area remain in effect.

A regulation adopted under this section applies to land owned by the state but does not apply to land not owned by the state that is located within the boundaries of a municipality unless the regulation has been approved by the municipality.

The provisions of AS

41.21.025(b)

and (c) do not apply to the land and water described in AS

41.21.502(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 2009; am § 22 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose applicable to the 2009 amendment of (b)(2) of this section, see § 1, ch. 61, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Kenai River special management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 17.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 23, 2009, in (b)(2), added the language beginning “; notwithstanding the requirements established by the commissioner” to the end of the subsection.

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, deleted “notwithstanding the requirements established by the commissioner to implement this paragraph, the commissioner shall establish a procedure by which the holder of a valid sport fishing operator license issued under AS

16.40.260

may petition for, and the director of the division of parks, or the director’s designee, shall expeditiously issue, a waiver to allow the sport fishing operator license holder to use the services in the Kenai River Special Management Area of a guide licensed under AS

16.40.270

who has not completed the procedures and additional controls that are required by the department under this paragraph; the waiver authorized in this paragraph applies only for the duration of the sport fishing season during which the waiver application is submitted and only if the sport fishing operator license holder (A) employing the licensed guide has lost the services of a licensed guide because of unforeseen circumstances; and (B) is unable to hire as a replacement an available licensed guide who has satisfied all the requirements of this paragraph, including those required by regulation” at the end of (b)(2).

Sec. 41.21.508.
Acquisition of additional land; adjustment of boundaries.

The commissioner may acquire title to or an interest in land or improvements on land that is adjacent to or within the boundaries of the Kenai River Special Management Area in the name of the state in order to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

, by lease, purchase, exchange under AS 38.50, bequest, gift, or other lawful means but not by eminent domain.

The commissioner may adjust the boundaries of the Kenai River Special Management Area under AS

38.05.295

—

38.05.300

by adding state-owned land and water to the Kenai River Special Management Area to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984)

Sec. 41.21.510.
Advisory committee.

In developing and implementing the management plan required by AS

41.21.506(a)

, the commissioner shall appoint an advisory board. The commissioner and the advisory board shall jointly hold public meetings during development of the management plan in the areas affected. The commissioner shall consult with and solicit recommendations from the advisory board and from federal and state agencies, interest groups, and other interested members of the public.

The advisory board appointed under this section shall be representative of user groups, resident property owners, municipalities adjacent to the Kenai River and other interest groups. Unless appointed as a representative of a user group, resident property owners, a municipality adjacent to the Kenai River, or another interest group, an employee, elected official, or other representative of a federal or state government may be appointed to the advisory board only as an ex officio member serving without a vote. A majority of the voting members of the advisory group shall be residents of the Kenai Peninsula Borough.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 141 SLA 2004)

Sec. 41.21.512.
Cooperative management agreements.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative management agreements with a federal agency, a municipality, another state agency, or a private landowner to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984)

Sec. 41.21.514.
Civil enforcement.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the attorney general may seek an injunction and damages at the request of the commissioner for a violation of a regulation adopted under AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

or a regulation that is applicable to the Kenai River Special Management Area established under AS

41.21.502

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1984)

Sec. 41.21.518.
Business Park Wetlands Special Management Area established.

The present and future state-owned land and water within the parcels described in this section, are designated as the Business Park Wetlands Special Management Area. The special management area is established to protect and preserve this land and water for its unique and exceptional fishery and wildlife resources and habitat and recreational and scenic resource values, and to designate it as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, sec. 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska. The state-owned land and water within the following parcels is reserved from all uses incompatible with its primary function as a special management area, except for utility easements, and is assigned to the department:

Township 13 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Section 31: N1/2SW1/4NW1/4 Parcel 25

N1/2SE1/4NW1/4 Tract A Doubletree Center Subdivision

N1/2S1/2NW1/4NW1/4 Parcel 28

South 375 feet of Government Lot 1 except that portion included within the boundaries of the Pyhala Subdivision according to plat P — 197.

History.

(§ 1 ch 132 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For authority of commissioner to enter into maintenance agreements with a private organization and for relationship between the initial agreement and the effective date of AS

41.21.518

-

41.21.522

, see §§ 2 and 4, ch. 132, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 41.21.520.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner may designate by regulation incompatible uses for the state-owned land and water within the Business Park Wetlands Special Management Area in accordance with the requirements of AS

41.21.518

—

41.21.522

.

In designating incompatible uses by regulation under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall consult with the public, the Business Park Wetlands Coalition, or any successor organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 132 SLA 1992)

Sec. 41.21.522.
Acquisitions authorized; eminent domain prohibited.

The commissioner may acquire by gift or purchase in the name of the state title to or interest in real property within the Business Park Wetlands Special Management Area. The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land for inclusion in the Business Park Wetlands Special Management Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 132 SLA 1992)